Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.216.828 and 2025 c 424 s 957 are each amended to read as follows:(1) It is the intent of the legislature to systemically increase child care subsidy rates over time until rates are equal to the full cost of providing high quality child care.(2) Beginning July 1, 2026, child care subsidy base rates must achieve the 85th percentile of market, as established by the most recent market rate survey published before May 20, 2025, for licensed or certified child care providers. The state and the exclusive representative for family child care providers must enter into bargaining over the implementation of the subsidy rate increase under this subsection.(3)(a) The department shall build upon the work of the child care collaborative task force to develop and implement a child care cost estimate model and use the completed child care cost model to recommend subsidy rates at levels that are sufficient to compensate licensed or certified child care providers for the full costs of providing high quality child care. The department shall consider:(i) Adjusting rates to reflect cost of living such as area median income, cost of living by zip code, and grouping by categories such as rural, suburban, or urban; and(ii) Incorporating the rate model for nonstandard child care hours developed under section 306, chapter 199, Laws of 2021.(b) The department shall build upon the work of the child care collaborative task force to evaluate options to support access to affordable health care insurance coverage for licensed or certified child care providers.(4)(a)(i) On the schedule identified in (a)(ii) of this subsection, and based on the most recent available market rate survey, the department must review and rebase the child care rate regions to include regional adjustments in the child care subsidy base rates that reflect the actual cost of living and economic differences between regions. The department must take into consideration the factors outlined in subsection (3)(a)(i) of this section, and is encouraged to designate regions on a basis more localized than on the county level.(ii) The department must complete an initial review and rebase by August 1, 2026, and a subsequent review and rebase by August 1st every four years thereafter, and report each review and rebase by those completion dates to the legislature in compliance with RCW 43.01.036.(b) No provider may receive a lower child care subsidy base rate as compared to its prior year only as a result of adjustments that reflect updated child care rate regions.(5) This section does not interfere with, impede, or in any way diminish the right of family child care providers to bargain collectively with the state through the exclusive bargaining representatives as provided for under RCW 41.56.153.--- END ---